New York, session 2025-2026, A3661.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19-0301 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Any rules or regulations relating to hydrofluorocarbon substances 4 established or implemented by the department shall conform with, and 5 shall not exceed, any applicable rules or regulations set forth by the 6 United States environmental protection agency relating to hydrofluoro- 7 carbon substances. For the purposes of this subdivision, "hydrofluoro- 8 carbon substances" shall mean any substances used in air conditioning 9 and refrigeration equipment, aerosol propellants and foam end-uses. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01066-01-5